Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB451.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 45 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 311. Disclosure of taxpayer-funded advertising and public notices.(a) Dollar amount.--An advertisement, legal advertisement, official advertisement or legal notice required to be published in a newspaper under the following must include the dollar amount paid by the advertiser in the lower right-hand corner:(1) The act of June 24, 1931 (P.L.1206, No.331), known as The First Class Township Code.(2) The act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code.(3) Article II of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, 123456789101112131415161718 No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(4) The act of July 28, 1953 (P.L.723, No.230), known as the Second Class County Code.(5) The act of July 15, 1957 (P.L.901, No.399), known as the Optional Third Class City Charter Law.(6) 8 Pa.C.S. (relating to boroughs and incorporated towns).(7) 11 Pa.C.S. (relating to cities).(8) 16 Pa.C.S. (relating to counties).(9) 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(b) Additional fee prohibited.--A publisher of an advertisement, legal advertisement, official advertisement or legal notice under subsection (a) may not charge an additional fee for inclusion of the dollar amount paid in the publication.Section 2. This act shall apply to an advertisement, legal advertisement, official advertisement or legal notice published on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0451PN0413 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718